Missouri, session 2026, SB1299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 304.015, 304.151, and 479.359, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 304.015, 304.151, and 479.359, to read as
follows:
304.015. 1. All vehicles not in motion shall be
placed with their right side as near the right-hand side of
the highway as practicable, except on streets of
municipalities where vehicles are obliged to move in one
direction only or parking of motor vehicles is regulated by
ordinance.
2. Upon all public roads or highways of sufficient
width a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the
roadway, except as follows:
(1) When overtaking and passing another vehicle
proceeding in the same direction pursuant to the rules
governing such movement;
(2) When placing a vehicle in position for and when
such vehicle is lawfully making a left turn in compliance
with the provisions of sections 304.014 to 304.025 or
traffic regulations thereunder or of municipalities;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1299 2
(3) When the right half of a roadway is closed to
traffic while under construction or repair;
(4) Upon a roadway designated by local ordinance as a
one-way street and marked or signed for one-way traffic.
3. It is unlawful to drive any vehicle upon any
highway or road which has been divided into two or more
roadways by means of a physical barrier or by means of a
dividing section or delineated by curbs, lines or other
markings on the roadway, except to the right of such barrier
or dividing section, or to make any left turn or
semicircular or U-turn on any such divided highway, except
at an intersection or interchange or at any signed location
designated by the state highways and transportation
commission or the department of transportation. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to emergency
vehicles, law enforcement vehicles or to vehicles owned by
the commission or the department.
4. The authorities in charge of any highway or the
state highway patrol may erect signs temporarily designating
lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular
direction, regardless of the center line of the highway, and
all members of the Missouri highway patrol and other peace
officers may direct traffic in conformance with such signs.
When authorized signs have been erected designating off-
center traffic lanes, no person shall disobey the
instructions given by such signs.
5. Whenever any roadway has been divided into three or
more clearly marked lanes for traffic, the following rules
in addition to all others consistent herewith shall apply:
(1) A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practicable
entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from

SB 1299 3
such lane until the driver has first ascertained that such
movement can be made with safety;
(2) Upon a roadway which is divided into three lanes a
vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane, except when
overtaking and passing another vehicle where the roadway
ahead is clearly visible and such center lane is clear of
traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for a left
turn or where such center lane is at the time allocated
exclusively to traffic moving in the direction the vehicle
is proceeding and is sign-posted to give notice of such
allocation;
(3) Upon all highways any vehicle proceeding at less
than the normal speed of traffic thereon shall be driven in
the right-hand lane for traffic or as close as practicable
to the right-hand edge or curb, except as otherwise provided
in sections 304.014 to 304.025;
(4) Official signs may be erected by the highways and
transportation commission or the highway patrol may place
temporary signs directing slow-moving traffic to use a
designated lane or allocating specified lanes to traffic
moving in the same direction and drivers of vehicles shall
obey the directions of every such sign;
(5) Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite
directions shall pass each other to the right, and except
when a roadway has been divided into traffic lanes, each
driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the main
traveled portion of the roadway whenever possible.
6. All vehicles in motion upon a highway having two or
more lanes of traffic proceeding in the same direction shall
be driven in the right-hand lane except when overtaking and
passing another vehicle or when preparing to make a proper
left turn or when otherwise directed by traffic markings,

SB 1299 4
signs or signals. Violations of this subsection shall be
punished by a fine of at least three hundred dollars in
addition to other penalties that may be specified by law.
7. All trucks registered for a gross weight of more
than forty-eight thousand pounds shall not be driven in the
far left-hand lane upon all interstate highways, freeways,
or expressways within urbanized areas of the state having
three or more lanes of traffic proceeding in the same
direction. This restriction shall not apply when:
(1) It is necessary for the operator of the truck to
follow traffic control devices that direct use of a lane
other than the right lane; or
(2) The right half of a roadway is closed to traffic
while under construction or repair.
8. As used in subsection 7 of this section, "truck"
means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer, or any combination thereof, propelled or drawn
by mechanical power and designed for or used in the
transportation of property upon the highways. The term
"truck" also includes a commercial motor vehicle as defined
100 in section 301.010.
101 9. Violation of this section shall be deemed a class C
102 misdemeanor unless such violation causes an immediate threat
103 of an accident, in which case such violation shall be deemed
104 a class B misdemeanor, or unless an accident results from
105 such violation, in which case such violation shall be deemed
106 a class A misdemeanor.
304.151. 1. Except in the case of an accident
resulting in the injury or death of any person, the driver
of a vehicle which for any reason obstructs the regular flow
of traffic on the roadway of any state highway shall make
every reasonable effort to move the vehicle or have it moved

SB 1299 5
so as not to block the regular flow of traffic. Any person
who fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection
is guilty of an infraction and, upon conviction thereof,
shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor
more than fifty dollars.
2. [Prior to January 1, 1999, any person who fails to
comply with the requirements of this section shall be issued
a written warning of the violation in order to inform such
persons of the requirements of this section. Beginning
January 1, 1999, any person who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section is guilty of an infraction and,
upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not
less than ten dollars nor more than fifty dollars.] The
driver of a motor vehicle on a two-lane roadway outside of
an urban area shall pull the motor vehicle off the roadway
at the first opportunity to pull over safely if there are
five or more motor vehicles immediately following that motor
vehicle. Any person who fails to comply with the
requirements of this subsection is guilty of an infraction
and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of
one hundred dollars.
479.359. 1. Every county, city, town, and village
shall annually calculate the percentage of its annual
general operating revenue received from fines, bond
forfeitures, and court costs for municipal ordinance
violations and minor traffic violations, including amended
charges for any municipal ordinance violations and minor
traffic violations, whether the violation was prosecuted in
municipal court, associate circuit court, or circuit court,
occurring within the county, city, town, or village. If the
percentage is more than thirty percent, the excess amount
shall be sent to the director of the department of revenue.

SB 1299 6
The director of the department of revenue shall set forth by
rule a procedure whereby excess revenues as set forth in
this section shall be sent to the department of revenue.
The department of revenue shall distribute these moneys
annually to the schools of the county in the same manner
that proceeds of all fines collected for any breach of the
penal laws of this state are distributed.
2. Beginning January 1, 2016, the percentage specified
in subsection 1 of this section shall be reduced from thirty
percent to twenty percent, unless any county, city, town, or
village has a fiscal year beginning on any date other than
January first, in which case the reduction shall begin on
the first day of the immediately following fiscal year
except that any county with a charter form of government and
with more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and
any city, town, or village with boundaries found within such
county shall be reduced from thirty percent to twelve and
one-half percent.
3. An addendum to the annual financial report
submitted to the state auditor under section 105.145 by the
county, city, town, or village that has chosen to have a
municipal court division shall contain an accounting of:
(1) Annual general operating revenue as defined in
section 479.350;
(2) The total revenues from fines, bond forfeitures,
and court costs for municipal ordinance violations and minor
traffic violations occurring within the county, city, town,
or village, including amended charges from any municipal
ordinance violations and minor traffic violations;
(3) The percent of annual general operating revenue
from fines, bond forfeitures, and court costs for municipal
ordinance violations and minor traffic violations occurring

SB 1299 7
within the county, city, town, or village, including amended
charges from any charged municipal ordinance violations and
minor traffic violation, charged in the municipal court of
that county, city, town, or village; and
(4) Said addendum shall be certified and signed by a
representative with knowledge of the subject matter as to
the accuracy of the addendum contents, under oath and under
the penalty of perjury, and witnessed by a notary public.
4. On or before December 31, 2015, the state auditor
shall set forth by rule a procedure for including the
addendum information required by this section. The rule
shall also allow reasonable opportunity for demonstration of
compliance without unduly burdensome calculations.
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply with
regard to municipal ordinance violations or minor traffic
violations requiring that:
(1) Vehicles in motion upon a highway having two or
more lanes of traffic proceeding in the same direction shall
be driven in the right-hand lane except when overtaking and
passing another vehicle or when preparing to make a proper
left turn or when otherwise directed by traffic markings,
signs, or signals; or
(2) The driver of a motor vehicle on a two-lane
roadway outside of an urban area shall pull the motor
vehicle off the roadway at the first opportunity to pull
over safely if there are five or more motor vehicles
immediately following that motor vehicle.
✓